Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Chapter 24. Virginia Historic Preservation Foundation.

§§ 10.1-2400 through 10.1-2404.

Repealed by Acts 1999, c. 558, effective January 1, 2003.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1999, c. 558, cl. 4, provides: “That Chapter 24 (§§

10.1-2400

through 10.1-2404) of Title 10.1 of the Code of Virginia is repealed effective January 1, 2003, if the assets of the Virginia Historic Trust Fund have not been reconveyed to the Virginia Historic Preservation Foundation under subsection C of § 2 of the second enactment of this act.” The Virginia Code Commission has indicated that this contingency was met. Chapter 24 is repealed effective January 1, 2003.